Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8176.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-5.2-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-5.2-20. Childcare assistance — Families or assistance units eligible.
(a) The department shall provide appropriate child care to every participant who is eligible
for cash assistance and who requires child care in order to meet the work requirements in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) Low-income child care. The department shall provide child care to all other working
families with incomes at or below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal poverty
level if, and to the extent, these other families require child care in order to work at paid
employment as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. The department shall also provide
child care to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal
poverty level if, and to the extent, these families require child care to participate on a short-term
basis, as defined in the department’s rules and regulations, in training, apprenticeship, internship,
on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other job-readiness/job-attachment
program sponsored or funded by the human resource investment council (governor’s workforce
board) or state agencies that are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to § 42-102-11.
Effective from January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare
assistance to families with incomes below one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal poverty
level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain

enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education provided that eligibility to
receive funding is capped when expenditures reach $200,000 for this provision. Effective July 1,
2022 through December 31, 2024, the The department shall also provide childcare assistance to
families with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level when such
assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode
Island public institution of higher education. Effective January 1, 2025, the department shall also
provide childcare assistance to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%)
of the federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to
enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.
(c) The department shall also provide childcare assistance to families who meet the
requirements of the protective services category. For the purposes of this section, "protective
services category" shall mean foster or kinship children served through the department of children,
youth and families.
(c)(d) No family/assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter
if the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which
corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth
in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. Liquid resources are defined as any
interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or accounts that are readily
convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These include, but are not limited to: cash, bank, credit
union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money market accounts; certificates of
deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and other similar financial instruments
or accounts. These do not include educational savings accounts, plans, or programs; retirement
accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with another adult, not including a spouse.
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to determine the ownership and
source of the funds in the joint account.
(d)(e) As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or
caretaker relative of the family must consent to, and must cooperate with, the department in
establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support
orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in
accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker
relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(e)(f) For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care, including
infant, toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school-age, that is provided by a person or
organization qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies
LC005320 - Page 2 of 5

designated to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth herein.
(f)(g)(1) Families with incomes below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable
federal poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free child care. Families with incomes
greater than one hundred percent (100%) and less than two hundred percent (200%) of the
applicable federal poverty guideline shall be required to pay for some portion of the child care they
receive, according to a sliding-fee scale adopted by the department in the department’s rules, not
to exceed seven percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h)(i) of this section.
(2) Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for
childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding two hundred sixty-one percent (261%)
of the applicable federal poverty guidelines shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance
until their incomes exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal poverty
guidelines. To be eligible, the families must continue to pay for some portion of the child care they
receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h)(i) of this section, and in accordance with all
other eligibility standards.
(g)(h) In determining the type of child care to be provided to a family, the department shall
take into account the cost of available childcare options; the suitability of the type of care available
for the child; and the parent’s preference as to the type of child care.
(h)(i) For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §
40-5.2-11 means gross, earned income and unearned income, subject to the income exclusions in
§§ 40-5.2-10(g)(2) and 40-5.2-10(g)(3), and income for other families shall mean gross, earned and
unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.
(i)(j) The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast
the expenditures for child care in accordance with the provisions of § 35-17-1.
(j)(k) In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve
components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family
composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior
to the month of leaving for active duty. This shall continue until the individual is officially
discharged from active duty.
(k)(l) Effective from August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2028, the department shall provide
funding for child care for eligible childcare educators, and childcare staff, who work at least twenty
(20) hours a week in licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare homes as defined in
the department’s rules and regulations. Eligibility is limited to qualifying childcare educators and
childcare staff with family incomes up to three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal
LC005320 - Page 3 of 5

poverty guidelines and will have no copayments. Qualifying participants may select the childcare
center or family childcare home for their children. The department shall promulgate regulations
necessary to implement this section, and will collect applicant and participant data to report
estimated demand for state-funded child care for eligible childcare educators and childcare staff.
The report shall be due annually to the governor and the general assembly by November 1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005320
========
LC005320 - Page 4 of 5